Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9083. HUDSPETH COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9083.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Hudspeth County Water Control and Improvement District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9083.0002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district established under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9083.0003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is essential to the accomplishment of the preservation and conservation of the natural resources of the state.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the district, the district's improvements, and the purposes for which the district is created.

(c) This chapter addresses a subject in which the state is interested.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9083.0004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 299, Acts of the 56th Legislature, Regular Session, 1959, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The district shall include all land and property in the district's territory.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9083.0005. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9083.0051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9083.0101. GENERAL POWERS. The district may exercise the powers essential to the accomplishment of the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and may exercise the rights, powers, privileges, and functions implied by that section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9083.0102. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9083.0151. TAX METHOD. (a) Taxes imposed by the district shall be on the ad valorem basis.

(b) The district is not required to hold a hearing on the plan of taxation.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.